New York, session 2025-2026, A7157.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The insurance law is amended by adding a new section 3218-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 3218-a. Required disclosure to Medicare supplemental insurance poli- 4 cy holders. (a) Every insurer offering a renewal of a contract to a 5 closed block member, or notifying such closed block member of a proposed 6 or approved change in the premiums or the benefits under such contract, 7 shall notify such member in writing, in a form approved by the super- 8 intendent, of: (1) the ability of such member to purchase a different 9 policy without undergoing a pre-existing condition waiting period 10 providing there was continuous coverage the previous six months; and (2) 11 the availability of any policy or contract offered by such insurer 12 providing similar benefits at a lower premium, and a toll-free telephone 13 number and internet website where such member may find information 14 regarding policies providing similar benefits offered by another insur- 15 er, a corporation organized pursuant to article forty-three of this 16 chapter, or an organization certified pursuant to article forty-four of 17 the public health law. 18 (b) For the purposes of this section, "closed block member" shall mean 19 the holder of a contract of Medicare supplemental insurance issued by an 20 insurer pursuant to a form for which such insurer no longer solicits or 21 accepts new policyholders, but continues to offer renewal contracts to 22 existing policyholders under such form. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09333-01-5 A. 7157 2 1 § 2. The insurance law is amended by adding a new section 4331 to read 2 as follows: 3 § 4331. Required disclosure to Medicare supplemental insurance policy 4 holders. (a) Every corporation offering a renewal of a contract to a 5 closed block member, or notifying such closed block member of a proposed 6 or approved change in the premiums or the benefits under such contract, 7 shall notify such member in writing, in a form approved by the super- 8 intendent, of: (1) the ability of such member to purchase a different 9 contract without undergoing a pre-existing condition waiting period 10 providing there was continuous coverage the previous six months; and (2) 11 the availability of any policy or contract offered by such corporation 12 providing similar benefits at a lower premium, and a toll-free telephone 13 number and internet website where such member may find information 14 regarding contracts providing similar benefits offered by another insur- 15 er, a corporation organized pursuant to this article, or an organization 16 certified pursuant to article forty-four of the public health law. 17 (b) For the purposes of this section, "closed block member" shall mean 18 the holder of a contract of Medicare supplemental insurance issued by a 19 corporation pursuant to a form for which such corporation no longer 20 solicits or accepts new subscribers, but continues to offer renewal 21 contracts to existing subscribers under such form. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect on January first next succeeding the 23 date on which it shall have become a law and shall apply to all policies 24 issued, renewed, modified or altered on or after such date.